Arkansas, session 2025, SB555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-1-109(c), concerning the exceptions to
the statute of limitations that applies to each classification of criminal
offense, is amended to read as follows:
(c) If the period prescribed in subsection (b) of this section has
expired, a prosecution may nevertheless be commenced for:
(1) Any offense involving either fraud or breach of a fiduciary
obligation, within one (1) year after the offense is discovered or should
reasonably have been discovered by an aggrieved party or by a person who has
a legal duty to represent an aggrieved party and who is himself or herself
not a party to the offense; and
(2)(A) Any offense that is concealed involving felonious conduct
*CEB245*
03/21/2025 8:34:12 AM CEB245

SB555
in office by a public servant at any time within five (5) years after he or
she leaves public office or employment or within five (5) years after the
offense is discovered or should reasonably have been discovered, whichever is
sooner.
(B) However, in no event does this subdivision (c)(2)
extend the period of limitation by more than ten (10) years after the
commission of the offense; and
(3) The offense of video voyeurism, § 5-16-101, at any time
within one (1) year after the offense is discovered or should reasonably have
been discovered by the victim of the video voyeurism.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-16-101, concerning the criminal offense
of video voyeurism, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(e) It is not a defense to prosecution under this section that the
person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of this section was in a romantic
relationship with the other person who was secretly observed, viewed,
photographed, filmed, or videotaped.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-15-103(4), concerning the definition of
"domestic abuse" with respect to orders of protection, is amended to read as
follows:
(4) “Domestic abuse” means:
(A) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the
infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault
between family or household members; or
(B) Any sexual conduct between family or household
members, whether minors or adults, that constitutes a crime under the laws of
this state; or
(C) An act of secretly observing, viewing, photographing,
filming, or videotaping another person that constitutes the criminal offense
of video voyeurism under § 5-16-101;




03/21/2025 8:34:12 AM CEB245